Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-874
Deductions; school district; liability.

The school district shall not be liable to the professional or labor organization for any claim, demand, or cost arising out of the withholding of authorized amounts and the transmittal of deductions authorized by the school district employees under sections 79-872 and 79-873.

Laws 1979, LB 53, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,103;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 499.